Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB136.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9777 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is repealed:[§ 9777. Transfer of inmates in need of medical treatment.(a) Inmates committed to custody of department.--If an inmate is committed to the custody of the department, the department, the inmate or a person to whom the court grants standing to act on behalf of the inmate may petition the sentencing court to temporarily defer service of the sentence of confinement and temporarily remove the inmate committed to the custody of the department, or other facility, for placement in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care 123456789101112131415161718192021 location. The following shall apply:(1) The sentencing court may approve the petitioner's request to temporarily defer service of the sentence of confinement and place the inmate in a hospital or long-term care nursing facility under electronic monitoring by the department upon clear and convincing proof that all of the following apply:(i) The medical needs of the inmate can be more appropriately addressed in the hospital or long-term care nursing facility.(ii) The hospital or long-term care nursing facility requested by the petitioner has agreed to accept the placement of the inmate and to provide necessary medical care.(iii) The inmate is seriously ill and is expected by a treating physician to not live for more than one year.(iv) There are no writs filed or detainers lodged against the inmate and the inmate is not subject to any court order requiring the inmate's presence.(v) The placement in the hospital or long-term care nursing facility does not pose an undue risk of escape or danger to the community. In making this determination, the sentencing court shall consider the inmate's institutional conduct record, whether the inmate was ever convicted of a crime of violence, the length of time that the inmate has been imprisoned and any other factors the sentencing court deems relevant.(vi) The hospital or long-term care nursing facility has agreed to notify the department and the court of any material changes in the health status of the inmate, the 20250SB0136PN0136 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nature of the care provided or other information required by the department.(vii) Each agency representing the Commonwealth at a proceeding which resulted in an order committing or detaining the inmate, the State or local correctional facility housing the inmate and any registered crime victim have been given notice and an opportunity to be heard on the petition.(2) The sentencing court may approve the petitioner's request to temporarily defer service of the sentence of confinement in order for the inmate to receive care from a licensed hospice care provider, proposed by the petitioner and subject to electronic monitoring by the department, if all of the following are established by clear and convincing proof:(i) The inmate is terminally ill, not ambulatory and likely to die in the near future.(ii) The licensed hospice care provider can provide the inmate with more appropriate care.(iii) Appropriate medical care and palliative and supportive services will be provided by the licensed hospice care provider at the proposed hospice care location.(iv) The placement of the inmate in the proposed, licensed hospice care location does not pose an undue risk of escape or danger to the community. In making this determination, the sentencing court shall consider the inmate's institutional conduct record, whether the inmate was ever convicted of a crime of violence, the length of time that the inmate has been imprisoned and any other 20250SB0136PN0136 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 factors the sentencing court deems relevant.(v) The licensed hospice care provider has agreed to notify the department and the sentencing court of any material changes in the health status of the inmate, the nature of the hospice care provided or other information required by the department or the sentencing court.(vi) Each agency representing the Commonwealth at a proceeding which resulted in an order committing or detaining the inmate, the State or local correctional facility housing the inmate and any registered crime victim have been given notice and an opportunity to be heard on the petition.(3) Any order entered pursuant to this subsection temporarily deferring service of an inmate's sentence of confinement shall include a provision that the department or prosecuting attorney may at any time petition the sentencing court for an order directing that the inmate be recommitted to the custody of the department if the circumstances under which the inmate was released change or for any previously unknown circumstances, including a change in the inmate's medical status, the inmate's risk of escape, the inmate's danger to the community or the nature of the medical or other care provided by the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care provider.(4) The sentencing court may terminate at any time its order authorizing the temporary deferral of the service of an inmate's sentence of confinement entered pursuant to this subsection. An inmate taken into custody pursuant to an order directing the inmate's detention or recommitment under this subsection shall be delivered to the nearest State 20250SB0136PN0136 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 correctional institution pending a hearing on the matter.(b) Inmates committed to custody of other facilities.--An inmate not committed to the custody of the department but confined in an institution authorized to incarcerate or detain persons for criminal sentences, violations of criminal law or orders of parole, probation, bail or other order related to a civil or criminal matter may have service of the sentence of confinement deferred and may be placed in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or licensed hospice care location, subject to electronic monitoring, by order of the judge that committed the inmate to the facility or institution or by another available judge designated to preside if all of the following are established by clear and convincing proof:(1) The chief administrator, the chief administrator's designee, the inmate or a person to whom the court grants standing to act on behalf of the inmate petitions the court or has given written consent to the grant of a petition under this section filed on behalf of the inmate.(2) There is sufficient proof to establish the requirements for a placement to a hospital or long-term care nursing facility under subsection (a)(1) or a placement to a hospice care location under subsection (a)(2).(3) An entry of an order pursuant to this subsection temporarily deferring service of an inmate's sentence of confinement shall include a provision that the chief administrator or the prosecuting attorney may at any time petition the sentencing court seeking the issuance of a bench warrant directing that the inmate be recommitted to the custody of the appropriate correctional institution if the circumstances under which the inmate was released change or 20250SB0136PN0136 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for previously unknown circumstances, including a change in the inmate's medical status, the inmate's risk of escape, the inmate's danger to the community or the nature of the medical or other care provided by the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care provider.(4) The sentencing court may terminate at any time its order authorizing the temporary deferral of the service of an inmate's sentence of confinement entered pursuant to this subsection. An inmate taken into custody pursuant to an order directing detention or recommitment under this subsection shall be delivered to the county correctional institution or other institution at which the inmate was confined prior to the entry of the order deferring the service of the sentence of confinement pending a hearing on the matter.(c) Service.--Any petition filed under this section shall be served on each agency representing the Commonwealth at each proceeding which resulted in an order by which the inmate is committed or detained and to the correctional institution or institution responsible for housing the inmate. Each party shall have an opportunity to object and be heard as to the petition for alternative placement, the circumstances of placement, the conditions of return or any other relevant issue. The court shall ensure that any crime victim entitled to notification under section 201(7) or (8) of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, has been given notice and the opportunity to be heard on the petition. All parties served or notified under this subsection shall receive a copy of the final order adjudicating the petition.(d) Notice.--(1) Any order entered under this section placing an 20250SB0136PN0136 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 inmate in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location which provides care to persons who were not placed therein pursuant to an order entered under this section shall direct the individual in charge of the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location to ensure that each person receiving care at, and each employee or contractor working in, the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location is notified that the placement was ordered if it is foreseeable that the person, employee or contractor will come into contact with the inmate during the placement.(2) The sentencing court shall forward notice of any order entered under this section placing an inmate in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location to the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location and to the Department of Human Services.(e) Petition requirements.--Any petition filed pursuant to this section must aver:(1) The name of the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location proposed for placement.(2) That the petitioner reasonably believes the named hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location has agreed to accept the placement of the inmate and the facts upon which that belief is based.(f) Removal from placement.--If an inmate placed in a hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location pursuant to this chapter removes himself from the hospital, long-term care nursing facility or hospice care location, the inmate shall be subject to arrest upon probable 20250SB0136PN0136 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cause and shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of criminal contempt.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chief administrator." As defined under 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth."Hospice care location." A home, independent living environment or inpatient setting that provides a coordinated program of palliative and supportive services through a licensed hospice care provider."Hospital." An entity licensed as an acute-care general hospital, a specialty hospital or a rehabilitation hospital under the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Licensed hospice care provider." A hospice as defined under section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Long-term care nursing facility." A long-term care nursing facility as defined under section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Prosecuting attorney." The Office of Attorney General of the Commonwealth or the office of a district attorney of a county who represented the Commonwealth at the most recent sentencing of an inmate."Sentencing court." The trial judge who most recently sentenced an inmate or, if the trial judge is no longer serving as a judge of that court, the president judge of the county 20250SB0136PN0136 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 court of common pleas.]Section 2. Title 61 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 6144. Parole for reasons of age or illness.(a) Eligibility.-- N otwithstanding any other provision of law, the board may grant parole to an incarcerated individual upon petition by the department or the incarcerated individual if any of the following apply:(1) The incarcerated individual has a substantially diminished ability to function in a correctional institution due to any of the following : (i) A terminal illness.(ii) A chronic and debilitating physical or medical condition or disease.(iii) A serious functional or cognitive impairment.(iv) Deteriorating physical or mental health due to the aging process.(2) All of the following criteria are met:(i) The incarcerated individual is at l east 55 years of age and has served the lesser of 25 years in prison or one-half of the minimum term imposed for the offense for which the incarcerated individual is currently imprisoned.(ii) The board determines that the incarcerated individual would not presently pose a danger to others or the general public if released.(b) Medical records.--The medical records of an incarcerated individual shall be made readily available to the incarcerated individual for purposes of filing a petition under subsection (a).(c) Department notification.--If the petition for parole is 20250SB0136PN0136 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 filed by the incarcerated individual under subsection (a), the incarcerated individual shall provide a copy of the petition to the department within seven business days of filing the petition.(d) Victim notification.--W ithin three business days of receiving an incarcerated individual's petition for parole or of the department's filing of a petition for parole on behalf of an incarcerated individual under subsection (a), the board shall, subject to any applicable confidentiality requirements, take all of the following actions:(1) Notify the Office of Victim Advocate and any registered victim of the incarcerated individual's offense of the petition and the general reasons for the petition.(2) Provide the Office of Victim Advocate and any registered victims of the incarcerated individual an opportunity to respond within seven days in writing to the board.(e) Attorney and family notification.--(1) No later than 72 hours after an incarcerated individual is diagnosed with a terminal illness, the department shall, subject to any applicable confidentiality requirements, take all of the following actions:(i) Notify the attorney, spouse or partner or an immediate family member of the incarcerated individual of the incarcerated individual's condition.(ii) Inform the attorney, spouse or partner or an immediate family member of the incarcerated individual that the attorney, spouse or partner or immediate family member may prepare and submit on the incarcerated individual's behalf a petition for parole in accordance 20250SB0136PN0136 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with subsection (a).(iii) Provide the incarcerated individual's medical records to the incarcerated individual and the attorney, spouse or partner or an immediate family member of the incarcerated individual.(2) No later than seven days after the date an incarcerated individual is diagnosed with a terminal illness, the department shall provide the spouse or partner and family members of the incarcerated individual, including extended family, with an opportunity to visit the incarcerated individual in person unless compelling reasons exist for denying visitation and the reasons are provided in writing.(3) U p on request from an incarcerated individual or the attorney, spouse or partner or a family member of the incarcerated individual, the department shall ensure that department employees assist the incarcerated individual in the preparation, drafting and submission of a petition for parole in accordance with subsection (a). In the case of an incarcerated individual who is physically or mentally unable to prepare or file a petition for parole under subsection (a) , the department shall have all of the following duties: (i) Inform the attorney, spouse or partner or an immediate family member of the incarcerated individual that the attorney, spouse or partner or immediate family member may prepare and submit on the incarcerated individual's behalf a petition for parole under subsection (a) . (ii) Upo n request from the incarcerated individual or the attorney, spouse or partner or an immediate family member of the incarcerated individual, take all of the 20250SB0136PN0136 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following actions:(A) Ensu re that department employees assist the incarcerated individual in the preparation, drafting and submission of a petition for parole under subsection (a).(B) With in three days of the request, provide the incarcerated individual's medical records to the incarcerated individual and the attorney, spouse or partner or an immediate family member of the incarcerated individual.(4) The department shall ensure that employees at all correctional institutions regularly and visibly post, including an incarcerated individual's handbook, staff training materials, law libraries and medical and hospice facilities, and make available to incarcerated individuals upon demand, notice of all of the following:(i) A n incarcerated individual's right to petition for parole under subsection (a).(ii) The procedures and deadlines for initiating and resolving petitions made under this subsection and subsections (d) and (f).(f) Duties of board.--(1) Within two days of receipt of a petition for parole under subsection (a), the board shall notify the secretary of the receipt of the petition and offer the secretary an opportunity to make a recommendation on the petition. No later than 10 days after receipt of notice that the board has received a petition, the secretary may offer a recommendation in writing to the board.(2) The board shall issue a decision on a petition for 20250SB0136PN0136 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parole under subsection (a) and state the reasons for the decision as follows:(i) Within 15 days for a petition made based on the criteria under subsection (a)(1).(ii) Within 30 days for a petition made based on the criteria under subsection (a)(2).(3) The board shall immediately provide a copy of the decision under paragraph (2) to all of the following:(i) The incarcerated individual.(ii) The incarcerated individual's attorney.(iii) The Office of Victim Advocate and any registered victim of the incarcerated individual's offense.(iv) The secretary.(4) T he board shall, when issuing a decision on the petition under paragraph (2), consider all of the following:(i) A response to the petition by the Office ofVictim Advocate and any registered victim of the incarcerated individual's offense.(ii) Recommendations by the secretary, if any.(iii) The incarcerated individual's offense that resulted in the conviction.(iv) The incarcerated individual's sentence and time served for the conviction.(v) The incarcerated individual's current age, physical and mental condition and ability to function within a correctional environment.(vi) The incarcerated individual's postrelease care plan if a plan exists.(vii) The incarcerated individual's disciplinary 20250SB0136PN0136 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 record, a full set of records of accomplishments and any records demonstrating rehabilitation while incarcerated.(viii) The likelihood that the incarcerated individual would pose a danger to others or the general public if released.(5) In granting parole under paragraph (2), the board may impose any reasonable terms and conditions of parole specifically tailored to the circumstances relating to the sentence that is the least restrictive of the incarcerated individual's individual liberty.(g) Denial of petition.--If the board denies a petition for parole under subsection (f):(1) The incarcerated individual may file a State court habeas corpus petition challenging the denial. The court shall act upon a petition by holding a hearing within 60 days of receipt of the petition.(2) The incarcerated individual or the department may submit another petition for parole under subsection (a) for reconsideration by the board:(i) within 30 days of receipt of notice of the denial; or(ii) if the incarcerated individual's medical condition demonstrably worsens.(3) In addition to paragraphs (1) and (2), the incarcerated individual or the department may submit another petition for parole under subsection (a) one year after the date that the initial petition was filed.(h) Right to counsel.--An incarcerated individual who submits a petition under subsection (a) or (g)(2) shall have the right to assistance of counsel, including appointment of counsel 20250SB0136PN0136 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the incarcerated individual is indigent, for proceedings in front of the board and for any State court habeas petition filed under subsection (g).(i) Reports.--No later than September 1, 2025, and each September 1 thereafter, the secretary shall submit to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives a report on petitions for parole under subsection (a) and shall make the report available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The report shall include a description of all of the following for the previous year:(1) T he number of incarcerated individuals granted and denied parole, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for parole.(2) The number of petitions initiated by or on behalf of incarcerated individuals, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for parole.(3) Th e number of petitions that department employees assisted incarcerated individuals in drafting, preparing or filing, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for parole, and the final decision made in each petition.(4) T he number of petitions that attorneys, spouses or partners and immediate family members of incarcerated individuals submitted on behalf of the incarcerated individuals, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for parole, and the final decision made in each petition.(5) T he number of petitions filed by the department, 20250SB0136PN0136 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for parole, and the final decision made in each petition . (6) For each petition filed by the department based on the criteria under subsection (a)(1), the time elapsed between the date the incarcerated individual was diagnosed and the date the department filed the petition, categorized by the criteria relied on as the grounds for parole, and the final decision made in each petition.(7) For each criteria specified under subsection (a), the number of incarcerated individuals who died while a petition for parole was pending.(8) The number of notifications by the department to attorneys, spouses or partners and family members of incarcerated individuals of their right to visit terminally ill incarcerated individuals as required under subsection (e)(2), whether visits occurred and how much time elapsed between the notifications and the visits.(9) The nu mber of visits to terminally ill incarcerated individuals that were denied by the department due to security or other concerns and the reasons given for the denials.(j) Regulations.--The board and the department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.(k) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Chronic and debilitating physical or medical condition or disease." A medical condition that is persistent or permanent, requires medication or ongoing care from a physician or impairs 20250SB0136PN0136 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a person's ability to perform routine daily tasks or self-care."Deteriorating physical or mental health." A loss of mobility in the limbs or body, an inability to walk without assistance, incontinence, forgetfulness or disorientation, an inability to perform routine daily tasks or self-care without assistance or supervision or a similar health issue."Serious functional or cognitive impairment." A c ondition that is persistent or permanent and limits the incarcerated individual's ability to reason, perceive, comprehend or communicate. The term includes, but is not limited to, intellectual disability, mental illness, dementia or brain damage from injury or stroke."Substantially diminished." The incarcerated individual is unable or only partially able to perform one or more essential daily tasks or self-care without partial or total assistance or supervision."T erminal illness." A disease or condition with an end-of- life trajectory, with or without a specific prognosis of life expectancy. The term includes metastatic solid-tumor cancer, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, en d-stage organ disease, advanced dementia or a similar disease or condition.§ 6145. Medical parole due to public or disaster emergency related to health or contagious disease outbreak.If a public or disaster emergency related to health is declared or a contagious disease outbreak occurs in a department facility which the facility is unable to contain or from which the facility cannot protect vulnerable individuals, the board may grant medical parole to an incarcerated individual who, due to the individual's age or underlying health conditions, is at risk of serious complications or death should the individual 20250SB0136PN0136 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contract the disease or virus. When granting medical parole under this section, the board may use any expedited review process it deems necessary and appropriate to release vulnerable individuals in a timely fashion.Section 3. All regulations and parts of regulations are abrogated to the extent of any inconsistency with the provisions of this act.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0136PN0136 - 18 - 12345678